Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 6
State Police Retirement

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6341, provided: “Effect of transfer on retirement system membership and health insurance plan participation.

“(a)

As used in this section, ‘retirement system’ means:

“(1)

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, established by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq.;

“(2)

The Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-5-103;

“(3)

The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, established by § 24-4-103;

“(4)

The State Police Retirement System, established by § 24-6-203;

“(5)

The Arkansas Judicial Retirement System, established by § 24-8-201 et seq.;

“(6)

An alternate retirement plan for:

“(A)

A college, university, or the Department of Higher Education provided for under § 24-7-801 et seq.; and

“(B)

A vocational-technical school or the Department of Career Education provided for under § 24-7-901 et seq.;

“(7)

The Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System provided for under § 24-10-101 et seq.; and

“(8)

A firemen's relief and pension fund or a policemen's pension and relief fund provided for under § 24-11-101 et seq.

“(b)

If this act results in an employee who is a current member of a retirement system prior to the effective date of this act being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different retirement system than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act by written election and notice to the new employer and affected retirement system, make a one-time choice to:

“(1)

Remain in his or her same retirement system prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Become a member of the retirement system of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions for a reciprocal member to be transferred as an active member to a reciprocal system as currently provided by law under the system to which the reciprocal member is transferred.

“(c)

If this act results in an employee being transferred to or affiliated with a cabinet-level department that is covered by a different health insurance plan than his or her previous state entity, the employee may, within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this act, make a one-time choice between:

“(1)

Continuing to participate in his or her health insurance plan prior to the effective date of this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law; or

“(2)

Participating in the health insurance plan of the cabinet-level department to which the employee is transferred to or affiliated with under this act, under the same conditions then provided by law or as may later be provided by law.

“(d)(1)(A)

A retirement system may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (b) of this section.

“(B)

The State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Board may issue policies establishing the procedure for an employee to exercise benefit options under subsection (c) of this section.

“(2)

A policy under subdivision (d)(1) of this section is not a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.”

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

State police retired employees, health insurance, § 12-8-210.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 28: Mar. 20, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It having been ascertained and determined by the General Assembly that on account of the widespread disregard for the traffic laws of the state and the rules and regulations governing the same as a result of the establishment of many large war plants and military posts in the State of Arkansas, together with the enormous increase of traffic caused by the war, which has created conditions at and around such war plants and military posts creating a condition upon the highways of this state which, in order to efficiently operate the Department of Arkansas State Police, make it necessary that the same be departmentalized and organized in such manner that the personnel of said department can be assigned and directed in a more efficient manner and because of the hazards to life and limb as a result of the disregard for the laws making such conditions dangerous to the health, peace, and safety of the people of Arkansas an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the peace, health, and safety of the citizens of this state and for the traveling public, this act shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 187, § 11: Mar. 12, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a reduction in work force caused by budgetary constraints may be avoided by offering early retirement incentives; that to offer early retirement incentives and to avoid unnecessary layoffs this Act should take effect immediately upon its passage. Therefore, an emergency is declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 11: Feb. 16, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the public retirement systems provide economic security for eligible citizens of Arkansas; that the statutes need amending to update and clarify existing law; and that these changes need to be made immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

24-6-101. System for payment of disability and retirement benefits and medical fees — Rules — Fund.

The Arkansas State Police Commission is authorized and empowered to create and administer a system of paying disability, pension, and retirement pay funds to members of the Division of Arkansas State Police and their dependents and survivors.

The commission shall have the authority and power, whenever it deems best, to pay medical expenses, including hospitalization fees and charges, of state police injured while in the performance of their official duties.

The commission shall have the authority and power to purchase and maintain in force group life, accident, and disability insurance upon the lives and members of the division upon such terms and conditions as it may deem necessary and proper.

However, the purchasing and maintaining of such insurance shall be discretionary, and not mandatory, on the part of the commission.

The commission is authorized and empowered to:

Promulgate and enforce all rules necessary to create and administer a system of paying medical and hospitalization fees, disability benefits, pensions, and retirement pay to members of the division;

Establish and prescribe the eligibility of members of the police force and their dependents and survivors in and to the benefits of the funds; and

Do any and all things necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.

There is created and established the State Police Retirement Fund, to which shall be credited any and all appropriations made by the General Assembly for the purposes outlined in this section.

Any unexpended balance of the appropriation made for the first fiscal year of any biennial period may be used for a like purpose during the second fiscal year.

Vouchers drawn upon and payable from the funds shall be drawn and paid in the manner provided by law for payment of obligations of the division.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, §§ 22-24; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-422 — 42-424; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2870.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1945, No. 231, is codified as §§ 12-8-101 — 12-8-107, 12-8-110 — 12-8-112, 12-8-114 — 12-8-116, 12-8-118, 12-8-119, 12-8-201 — 12-8-205, 12-8-209 [repealed], 12-8-213 and 12-12-103.

24-6-102. Early retirement incentives.

In addition to the provisions of § 24-6-214:

An employee who is an active member of the State Police Retirement System on March 12, 1987, and who is vested for a full age and service annuity and who has credit in the system for three (3) consecutive actual years of service with the Department of Arkansas State Police immediately prior to his or her retirement date, may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(1)(B)-(E) of this section, provided he or she retires during the period beginning with March 12, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive. However, an employee who participates in this retirement incentive program is not eligible to accept further employment with the department or in which the state is the employer.

In addition to his or her regular annuity, the system will pay the cost of the member's health insurance which he or she is eligible to continue as a retirant with the Arkansas State Police Employee Health Plan.

The payment is to be for the retirant's coverage only and to be paid from the date of his or her retirement until the retirant's death.

For the purpose of computing the member's annuity, his or her highest annual salary will be substituted for his or her final average compensation.

For the purpose of computing the member's annuity, he or she will receive an additional annuity equal to ten percent (10%) of his or her computed annuity.

A member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump-sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final annual salary of the employee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from the employer's accumulation account of the system.

An employee who is an active member of the system on March 12, 1987, and who has credit in the system for three (3) consecutive actual years of service with the department immediately prior to his or her retirement date and who has credit for not less than ten (10) actual years of service and has attained age forty-eight (48) or credit for not less than eighteen (18) actual years of service regardless of age, may choose two (2) of the retirement incentives from subdivisions (a)(2)(B)-(F) of this section, provided he or she retires during the period beginning with March 12, 1987, through January 1, 1988, inclusive. However, an employee who participates in this retirement incentive program is not eligible to accept further employment with the department or in which the state is the employer.

The system will pay the cost of the member's health insurance which he or she is eligible to continue as a retirant with the plan.

This payment is to be for the retirant's coverage only and is to be paid from the date of his or her retirement until the retirant has attained age sixty-five (65).

For the purpose of computing the member's annuity, his or her highest annual salary will be substituted for his or her final average compensation.

If the member is eligible for an early reduced annuity as provided in § 24-6-214(b)(1) and he or she is within two (2) years of his or her full annuity age, or if he or she has at least ten (10) years of credit and is within two (2) years of his or her full annuity age, then his or her annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

If a member has attained his or her full annuity age as provided by § 24-6-214(b)(2) and is within two (2) years of attaining the service requirement for a full annuity, then his or her annuity will not be reduced because of early retirement.

A member may receive a retirement bonus which is a lump-sum payment equal to ten percent (10%) of the final annual salary of the employee not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

The retirement bonus shall be paid from the employer's accumulation account of the system.

For those state police officers who retire pursuant to the provisions of this section, the amount paid by the system as the cost of the employee's health and basic life insurance shall not exceed the amount of the employer's contribution for the coverage on the date of the employee's retirement and may be reduced at the time the employee qualifies under Medicare or Medicaid programs.

Any future increase in the cost of this coverage shall be borne by the employee and not by the system from which the employee retired.

No position being vacated as a result of an employee retiring pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be filled without the written approval of the Governor or the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 187, §§ 2, 8, 9.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 3, provided that: “It is the intent of the act was to give fair and equal treatment to all employees and all elected officials under the Early Retirement Incentive Act.”

24-6-103. No waiver of sovereign immunity.

Nothing in this chapter shall be taken or interpreted as a waiver of the state's sovereign immunity.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 38, § 10.

24-6-104. Credit for service in National Guard and armed forces reserve.

As used in this section, “armed forces reserve” means one (1) of the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces.

A member of the State Police Retirement System may purchase credited service in the system for a period not to exceed five (5) years for compensated service rendered by the member in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve if the member:

Makes an application to the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System;

Provides the board with satisfactory proof of that person's service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve; and

Pays to the member's deposit account an amount equal to the actuarial present value of the credited service applied for under this section based upon assumptions recommended by the system's actuary.

The payment shall be credited to the member's deposit account and is in addition to any regular member contributions.

A member shall receive one (1) year of purchased service credit for every one (1) year of compensated service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve.

The service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve shall not become credited service under this system until the member:

Pays for the year of service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve prior to retirement; and

Has established five (5) or more years of actual service in the system.

If a member ceases to be an active member before the service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve has been established as system-credited service, the member payments contributed under this section are refundable, together with regular interest.

This section is supplemental to §§ 24-2-502 and 24-6-210, and this section does not diminish the right of any member of the system to obtain credited service in the system for active duty military service within the limits permitted by §§ 24-2-502 and 24-6-210.

However, a member is not entitled to receive more than five (5) years of credited service rendered by the member under this section.

A member is not eligible to purchase service credit in more than one (1) retirement system, whether federally or state-supported, for service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve.

Service credit in the system for active duty military service under §§ 24-2-502 and 24-6-210 and for service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve shall not be given for the same period of time.

A member's service in the National Guard or in the armed forces reserve shall not make the member eligible for any kind of benefit under any other state-supported retirement system except Social Security.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 562, § 1.

Subchapter 2
— State Police Retirement System

Cross References.

Pension for retired policemen receiving less than one-half salary, § 24-11-424.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1951, No. 311, § 11: Approved Mar. 19, 1951. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly: (1) that the establishment of a retirement system for officers of the Department of Arkansas State Police will have the effect of providing a greater incentive for qualified young men to enter State police work, and thereby increase the effectiveness of the Department; (2) that greater effectiveness is necessary to reduce the incidence of traffic accidents which have been increasing at an alarming rate and have been resulting in injuries and deaths to persons and damages to property; and (3) that the provisions of this Act will, in part, alleviate the foregoing conditions. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1967, No. 309, § 4: Became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 13, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the widows and surviving children of certain uniformed employees of the Arkansas State Police, who were killed in the line of duty, have been denied survivors' benefits under the State Police Retirement System by virtue of technicalities in said System, and it is determined by the General Assembly that adequate financing of said System is provided by law to pay such benefits, and the immediate passage of this Act is necessary in order that said widows and surviving children may receive such benefits as authorized by law without unnecessary delay. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 646, § 3: May 27, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 144 of 1969 which increases the employer contribution to the State Police Retirement System beginning July 1, 1969, did not contain an emergency clause and therefore will not become effective until ninety (90) days after adjournment of the 1969 Regular Session of the General Assembly; that due to the extension of the Regular Session as authorized in the Constitution the provisions of Act 144 will not be effective until well after July 1; that it is vitally important to the proper and efficient operation of the State Police Retirement System that the increase in contributions take effect on July 1, 1969 and that the provisions of this Act are immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 647, § 5: May 27, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 101 of 1969 which provides that effective July 1, 1969 the Executive Director and the staff of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System shall be the Executive Secretary and staff of the Arkansas State Police Retirement System, did not contain an emergency clause and therefore will not under Amendment No. 7 to the Constitution of Arkansas become effective until ninety (90) days after adjournment of the regular session of the Sixty-Seventh General Assembly; that due to the volume of business the regular session of the Sixty-Seventh General Assembly has been extended as authorized in the Constitution and will not be adjourned in time for acts not having an emergency clause to take effect before July 1; and that it is essential to the proper and efficient operation of the State Police Retirement System and the State Employees Retirement System that the provisions of this Act take effect on or before July 1, 1969. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 130, § 4: Feb. 19, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present provisions of the State Police Retirement System relating to the pension of a widow of a member of the system is not entirely clear regarding the duration of the pension to which the widow is entitled; that it is the intention of the General Assembly that the widow of any member who died or dies on or after January 1, 1956, shall be entitled to the pension provided for in subsection F of Section 5 of Act 311 of 1951, as amended, for her lifetime or until she remarries; that this Act is immediately necessary to clarify such provisions of the State Police Retirement System and to assure that the surviving widow of each member who died or dies on or after January 1, 1956, will receive the pension provided by law until such widow remarries or dies. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 309, § 8: July 1, 1971.

Acts 1974 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 93, § 10: July 23, 1974. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the unprecedented increase in the cost of living has resulted in a particular hardship to persons living on a fixed retirement income in the State of Arkansas; that it is essential to the health and well-being of persons retired under the Public Employees Retirement System that the benefits received by them be increased immediately to offset this unusual cost of living increase and that this Act should be given effect immediately in order to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 460, § 5: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State Police Retirement law does not currently contain any provision providing for vesting of interest of members in the System; that the laws relating to other public supported retirement systems in the State do provide for vesting in interest of members after a prescribed period of service; that this Act is designed to give members of the State Police Retirement System who have ten years or more of credited service and who cease to be employed in a position covered by the System prior to age fifty (50), the option to either withdraw the accumulated employee contributions to the System or to leave such contributions in the System and receive pension benefits upon meeting the age requirements of the System; that this Act should be given effect at the earliest possible date to grant such options to members of the System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 483, § 5: July 1, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that benefits now being paid to retired members of the State Police Retirement System are not consistent with benefits being paid to retired members of other State supported retirement plans and, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after July 1, 1981.”

Acts 1981, No. 855, § 4: Mar. 28, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the expenses incurred in the administration of the Arkansas State Police Retirement System should be paid from the ‘State Police Retirement Fund’ instead of the operating account of the State Police Department. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and the Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 555, § 3: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State Police Retirement System laws need to be amended to provide an increase of up to ten percent (10%) for those members and beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1982. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1987, No. 718, § 3: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the State Police Retirement laws need to be amended to provide for increased benefit for those members and beneficiaries who retired before July 1, 1982; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1987 is essential; that due to the extensions of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1987 could work irreparable harm on the retirees and beneficiaries covered hereunder. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 529, § 6 [7]: Mar. 14, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that current law terminates pension benefits for surviving children of Arkansas State Police officers based solely on age; that it is in the best interests of the state to encourage such children to pursue their educational needs beyond the secondary level; that by the continuation of pension benefits until age twenty-two (22) for surviving children enrolled in institutions of higher education, a greater percentage of those children who have suffered a loss will consider this pursuit; and that this is an immediate need for those surviving children which requires the immediate enactment of this legislation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 225, § 4: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that benefits provided to members of the Arkansas State Police Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to provide adequate benefits; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 380, § 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, the Arkansas State Police Retirement System and the Arkansas State Highway Employees Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 387, § 6: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1991 is essential to the operation of the State Police Retirement System and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1991 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 432, § 7: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided to retirants and beneficiaries under the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System and the Arkansas State Police Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship to many such retirants and beneficiaries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1997, No. 130, § 5: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency. It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the redetermination of benefits provision of the Arkansas State Police Retirement System needs clarification and that the effective administration of the system will be aided by implementing these changes at the beginning of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, in order to promote sound administration in State government, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall become effective July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 1997, No. 1071, § 7: Apr. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the current funding provisions of the State Police Retirement System are inadequate and that the benefit provisions of the system must be modified to restore the financial security of the system; that this act accomplishes those purposes; that this act should go into effect as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 387, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that historically the State Police Retirement System has recomputed retirement benefits on July 1 of each year to reflect a cost of living increase; that this act modifies the cost of living increase; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect of July 1 of this year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not be effective until July 1 of the succeeding year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 69: Feb. 8, 2001. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes technical corrections to a number of sections of Arkansas Code Title 24; that other legislation of this session of the General Assembly may also amend some of those sections; that this act should become effective immediately so that other legislation may be amended to reflect the technical corrections made by this act and to avoid conflicts. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 68, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the State Police Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 69, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the State Police Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2005, No. 1023, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to the members and benefit recipients of the State Police Retirement System that this act should become effective on July 1, 2005. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 404, § 5: Mar. 22, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act affects the benefits of certain members of the State Police Retirement System and that this act should become effective immediately to allow members of the system to properly plan their retirement and to allow the system appropriate time to implement the provisions of the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1242, §
6: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Arkansas State Police has had ongoing financial difficulty for over twelve (12) years; that the State Police Retirement System has sustained investment losses of approximately one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) within the last two (2) years; that a larger investment pool is needed to help reduce risk and enhance returns; that the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System has the size and expertise to effectively reduce the volatility of returns, enhance relative returns, and best protect the State Police Retirement System; and that this act is immediately necessary to protect the members and beneficiaries of the State Police Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.